New York, session 2025-2026, A10690.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The legislative law is amended by adding a new section 5-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 5-c. Apportionment of resources and staff to assist individual 4 members. 1. From within the amount generally appropriated to fund staff 5 positions for members of the legislature within such house of the legis- 6 lature, each member shall receive an identical amount to be utilized for 7 such member's personal staff, both in such member's Albany and district 8 legislative office or offices. 9 2. Where because of the demands of a member's position as an officer 10 of the house or the duties in a special capacity, additional funds may 11 be made available for staff to service those needs; however such staff 12 shall not be personally involved in duties otherwise related to a 13 member's constituent service. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 15 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03544-01-5